Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-101
State property; Governor the legal custodian.

The Governor is constituted the legal custodian of all the property of the state not specially entrusted to other officers by law; and he is authorized and empowered to take summary possession of such property of the state, without any process of law, and to adopt such measures as he may deem proper to preserve it from injury or deterioration.

Laws 1867, § 1, p. 100;

R.S.1913, § 5531;

C.S.1922, § 4827;

C.S.1929, § 84-101;

R.S.1943, § 84-101.